Utah statutes.
78B-6-117.   Who may adopt -- Adoption of minor.

(1)  A minor child may be adopted by an adult person, in accordance with the provisions and requirements of this section and this part.

(2)  A child may be adopted by:

(a)  adults who are legally married to each other in accordance with the laws of this state, including adoption by a stepparent; or

(b)  subject to Subsection (4), any single adult, except as provided in Subsection (3).

(3)  A child may not be adopted by a person who is cohabiting in a relationship that is not a legally valid and binding marriage under the laws of this state.

(4)  In order to provide a child who is in the custody of the division with the most beneficial family structure, when a child in the custody of the division is placed for adoption, the division or child-placing agency shall place the child with a man and a woman who are married to each other, unless:

(a)  there are no qualified married couples who:

(i)  have applied to adopt a child;

(ii)  are willing to adopt the child; and

(iii)  are an appropriate placement for the child;

(b)  the child is placed with a relative of the child;

(c)  the child is placed with a person who has already developed a substantial relationship with the child;

(d)  the child is placed with a person who:

(i)  is selected by a parent or former parent of the child, if the parent or former parent consented to the adoption of the child; and

(ii)  the parent or former parent described in Subsection (4)(d)(i):

(A)  knew the person with whom the child is placed before the parent consented to the adoption; or

(B)  became aware of the person with whom the child is placed through a source other than the division or the child-placing agency that assists with the adoption of the child; or

(e)  it is in the best interests of the child to place the child with a single person.

